Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF204.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 8 TLSB 2176YH (2) 91 jda/jh H.F. 204 Section 1. Section 256.9, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 69. Provide educational resources and 3 technical assistance to school districts related to chartering 4 career and technical student organizations that comply with 5 the Carl D. Perkins Career and Technical Education Improvement 6 Act of 2006, codified at 20 U.S.C. Â§2301 et seq., as amended, 7 and rules adopted by the state board, including career and 8 technical student organizations related to robotics and 9 robotics teams and competitions. 10 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 280.13D High school athletic 11 organizations ââ robotics. 12 1. An organization that receives moneys from a school 13 district to pay dues or membership fees, or moneys from a 14 nonpublic school originating from the state to pay dues or 15 membership fees, may sponsor or administer interscholastic 16 contests or competitions related to robotics. For purposes 17 of this section, âorganizationâ means the same as defined in 18 section 280.13. 19 2. This section shall not be construed to prohibit 20 an organization from sponsoring or administering other 21 interscholastic contests or competitions. 22